Utah statutes.
19-1-204.   Legal advice and representation for department.

(1)  The attorney general is the legal adviser for the department and the executive director and shall defend them in all actions and proceedings brought against either of them.

(2)  The attorney general or the county attorney of the county in which a cause of action arises or a public offense occurs shall bring any civil or criminal action requested by the executive director or any board created in Section 19-1-106 to abate a condition which exists in violation of, or to prosecute for the violation of or for the enforcement of, the laws or standards, orders, and rules of the department.

